Utah statutes.
31A-8-405.   Confidentiality of medical records and audits.

Unless a court orders otherwise, the department shall treat the following records and information as confidential and prevent their disclosure to the public:

(1)  the medical records of enrollees of an organization; and

(2)  the annual audits performed under Section 31A-8-404.



Enacted by Chapter 204, 1986 General Session

